Utah statutes.
10-8-2.5.   Prohibition against spending certain transportation funds.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Apportioned" means divided or assigned among the states based on a
prescribed formula established in 23 U.S.C.
(b)  "Authorization act" means an act of Congress enacted after July 1, 2009
that authorizes transportation programs from the Highway Trust Fund
established in 26 U.S.C. Sec. 9503.
(2)  A municipality may not spend project-specific funds that are allocated
through an authorization act for a transportation-related project that is
eligible for funds apportioned to the state in support of the statewide
transportation improvement program unless the specified project is included on
the statewide transportation improvement program.
